Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB739.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 909 of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 909. Manufacture, distribution, sale, transfer, use or possession of [master keys] illicit devices for motor vehicles.(a) Offense defined.--A person commits [a misdemeanor of the first degree if he manufactures, distributes, or possesses any motor vehicle master key.] the offense of manufacture, distribution, sale, transfer, use or possession of illicit devices for motor vehicles if the person:(1) Manufactures, sells, transfers, uses, possesses or attempts to manufacture, sell, transfer, use or possess an 123456789101112131415161718 illicit device.(2) Aids or permits another person to use an illicit device.(3) For a person listed under subsection (b)(4), (5), (6) or (7), fails to report a lost or stolen illicit device to the law enforcement agency with jurisdiction over the location where the illicit device was lost or stolen within 48 hours of discovering the loss or theft.(b) Exception.--Subsection [(a) of this section] (a)(1) and (2) shall not apply to:[(1) The introduction, manufacture for introduction, transportation, distribution, sale or possession in commerce in this Commonwealth of motor vehicle master keys for use in the ordinary course of business by any commercial or professional locksmith, common carrier, contract carrier, motor vehicle fleet owner, new or used car dealer, rental car agency, car manufacturer, automobile club or association operating in more than one state or an affiliate thereof, or any department, agency, or instrumentality of:(i) the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania, the United States, any state, the District of Columbia, or any possession of the United States; or(ii) any political subdivision of any entity specified in subparagraph (i) of this paragraph.(2) The shipment, transportation, or delivery for shipment in commerce in this Commonwealth of motor vehicle master keys in the ordinary course of business by any common carrier or contract carrier.](1) A law enforcement officer acting within the scope of the officer's official duties.20250SB0739PN1006 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) A department, agency, political subdivision or instrumentality of the United States, the Commonwealth, a state of the United States, the District of Columbia or any territory of the United States.(3) An employee of the National Insurance Crime Bureau.(4) Any of the following:(i) Common carrier.(ii) Contract carrier.(iii) Motor vehicle fleet owner.(iv) New or used car dealer.(v) Rental car agency.(vi) Car manufacturer.(vii) Licensed dealer, distributor or manufacturer of motor vehicles or motor vehicle locks.(viii) Automobile club or association operating in more than one state.(ix) Affiliate of an entity listed under this paragraph that is acting in the ordinary course of business.(5) A motor vehicle mechanic shop acting in the ordinary course of business.(6) A commercial or professional locksmith acting in the ordinary course of business.(7) A repossession agency acting in the ordinary course of business.(b.1) Grading.--(1) A person who violates subsection (a)(1) or (2) commits a misdemeanor of the first degree for a first offense. A second or subsequent offense shall constitute a felony of the third degree . 20250SB0739PN1006 - 3 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) A person who violates subsection (a)(3) commits a summary offense and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine of not less than $250. A person who violates subsection (a)(3) for a second or subsequent offense commits a summary offense and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine of not less than $500.(c) Definition.--[As used in this section "master key" means any key adapted to fit the ignition switch, trunk or door of two or more motor vehicles, the ignition switches, trunks or doors of which are designed to be operated by keys.] As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Illicit device." Any of the following:(1) A key adapted to fit the ignition switch, trunk or door of two or more motor vehicles for which each motor vehicle's ignition switch, trunk or door is designed to be operated by a key.(2) A device, computer program, application or software designed or used to electronically communicate with a motor vehicle for the purpose of programming or emulating a motor vehicle key fob to unlock or start the motor vehicle.(3) A device, computer program, application or software designed or used to intercept the signal from the key fob of a motor vehicle to unlock or start the motor vehicle.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0739PN1006 - 4 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526